Oklahoma, session 2026, SB646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 350, O.S.L.
2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3011), is amended to read as
follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 3011. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
“Oklahoma Federal Official and Judicial Security and Privacy Act of
2023 2025”.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 350, O.S.L.
2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3012), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3012. As used in this act the Oklahoma Federal Official
and Judicial Security and Privacy Act of 2025:
1. The term “at-risk individual” means any current elected
federal official of this state or active or retired member of the
State Judiciary, and shall also include municipal, county, tribal,
and federal judges;
2. The term “commercial entity” means any corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, proprietorship, sole
proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, or association engaged
in the buying or selling of goods or services for profit;
3. The term “covered information” means:
a. a home address, including primary residence or
secondary residences of an at-risk individual,
b. a home or personal mobile telephone number, or the
direct telephone number of a government-issued cell
phone or private extension in the chambers of an at-
risk individual,
c. a personal email address of an at-risk individual,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. the Social Security number, driver license number, or
home address displayed on voter registration
information of an at-risk individual,
e. the bank account or credit or debit card information
of an at-risk individual,
f. the home or other address displayed on property tax
records or held by a federal, state, or local
government agency of an at-risk individual, including
any secondary residence and any investment property at
which an at-risk individual resides for part of a
year,
g. a license plate number or home address displayed on
vehicle registration information of an at-risk
individual,
h. the identification of children under the age of
eighteen (18) of an at-risk individual or any child
under the age of twenty-six (26) whose permanent
residence is the home of the at-risk individual,
i. the full date of birth,
j. a photograph of any vehicle that legibly displays the
license plate or a photograph of a residence that
legibly displays the address of the residence of an
at-risk individual,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

k. the name and address of a school or day care facility
attended by immediate family of an at-risk individual,
l. the name and address of an employer of immediate
family of an at-risk individual, or
m. the name and address of a place of worship the at-risk
individual or immediate family of an at-risk
individual attends;
4. The term “immediate family” means a spouse, child, or parent
of an at-risk individual or any other familial relative of an at-
risk individual whose permanent residence is the same as the at-risk
individual;
5. The term “social media” means any online electronic medium
or a live chat system that:
a. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact
with content generated by other third-party users of
the medium,
b. enables users to create accounts or profiles specific
to the medium or to import profiles from another
medium, and
c. enables one or more users to generate content that can
be viewed by other third-party users of the medium;
6. The term “state agency” means:
a. an executive agency, as defined by Oklahoma Statute,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. any county, local or municipal governing body, or
regulatory body, and
c. any state agency in the judicial branch or legislative
branch; and
7. The term “transfer” means to sell, license, trade, or
exchange for consideration the covered information of an at-risk
individual or immediate family.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 350, O.S.L.
2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3013), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3013. A. Each at-risk individual may:
1. File written notice of the status of the individual as an
at-risk individual, for themselves and immediate family, with each
state agency that includes information necessary to ensure
compliance with this section, as determined by the Administrative
Director of the Courts; and
2. Request that each state agency described in Section 2 3012
of this act title mark as private their covered information and that
of their immediate family.
B. State agencies shall not publicly post or publicly display
content that includes covered information of an at-risk individual
or immediate family. State agencies, upon receipt of a written
request under paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section, shall
remove the covered information of the at-risk individual or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

imme diate family from publicly available content not later than
seventy-two (72) hours after such receipt.
C. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a state agency from
providing access to records containing the covered information of a
an elected federal official of this state or a member of the
judiciary to a third party if the third party:
1. Possesses a signed release from the elected federal
official, judge, or a lawful court order;
2. Is subject to the requirements of Title V of the federal
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C., Section 6801 et seq.; or
3. Executes a confidentiality agreement with the state agency.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 350, O.S.L.
2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3015), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3015. Not later than one (1) year after the effective
date of enactment of this act, and biennially thereafter, the
Administrative Director of the Courts shall submit to the
Legislature an annual report that includes:
1. A detailed amount spent by the state and local governments
on protecting judges’ covered information of elected federal
officials and judges;
2. Where the judges’ covered information of elected federal
officials and judges was found; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The collection of any new types of personal data found to be
used to identify elected federal officials or judges who have
received threats, including prior home addresses, employers, and
institutional affiliations such as nonprofit boards.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-115.2, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 147, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 4-115.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-115.2. A. 1. The Secretary of the State Election
Board is authorized to promulgate rules to keep confidential the
residence and mailing address, upon application to do so, of
individual registered voters who are members of certain classes as
described in paragraph 2 of this subsection.
2. Classes shall be limited to any current elected federal
official of this state, the judiciary, district attorneys, assistant
district attorneys, Uniformed Services uniformed services members,
law enforcement personnel and the immediate family of law
enforcement personnel, correctional officers, the secretary,
assistant secretary, employees, and members of a county election
board or the State Election Board, persons who are protected by
victim’s protection orders, the spouses and dependents of the
members of such classes, and persons who are certified by the
Secretary of State as participants in the Address Confidentiality
Program established by Section 60.14 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Such address information shall be provided to a candidate or
candidate representative or other lawful authority in anticipation
or as part of a contest of candidacy or contest of an election as
provided for in this title or as part of a petition challenge as
provided by law. However, no information concerning the address of
a certified Address Confidentiality Program participant shall be
released by election officials to any person for any purpose except
under court order.
B. As used in this section, “immediate family of law
enforcement personnel” means a spouse, child by birth or adoption,
stepchild or parent living at the same residence as the law
enforcement personnel.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB646 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)